Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB379.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Turnpike-to-Port Freight Reimbursement Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Company." Either of the following:(1) A business that is a licensee of the Pennsylvania Preferred® trademark under 3 Pa.C.S. Ch. 46 (relating to Pennsylvania Preferred® trademark).(2) A business that meets all of the following requirements:12345678910111213141516171819 (i) Has a physical headquarters located in this Commonwealth.(ii) Is registered with the Department of State of the Commonwealth.(iii) Grows or manufactures products in this Commonwealth.(iv) Uses the Pennsylvania Turnpike to transport products to the Port of Philadelphia for the purpose of shipping."Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Pennsylvania Turnpike-to-Port Freight Reimbursement Fund established under section 3(a)."Turnpike." The Pennsylvania Turnpike.Section 3. Pennsylvania Turnpike-to-Port Freight Reimbursement Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Turnpike-to-Port Freight Reimbursement Fund is established in the State Treasury for the purpose of reimbursing companies that pay tolls on the turnpike to transport products to the Port of Philadelphia for shipping. The money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department.(b) Application for reimbursement.--A company may apply to the department for reimbursement from the fund. The department shall provide an application form. A company shall submit all of the following with the application:(1) An itemized inventory of the products transported via the turnpike.(2) The place of origin of the products.(3) The name and address of any shipping contractor used 20250SB0379PN0326 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for transporting the products via the turnpike.(4) Proof of payment of turnpike tolls by the company or shipping contractor.(5) The date and time of the arrival of the products to the Port of Philadelphia.(6) Documentation that the products were shipped from the Port of Philadelphia, including the date of shipping, the name of the ship and the destination of the products.(7) The number of full-time, part-time and contract employees with the company.(8) The annual revenues of the company.(9) The history of the company, including when and where it was founded and how it has grown from founding to the present in terms of number of employees, revenues and locations.(c) Investigation of application.--The department shall investigate and confirm the accuracy of an application under subsection (b). The department may confer with the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission and the Port of Philadelphia to confirm the accuracy of an application.(d) Timing.--An application for reimbursement to the department shall be submitted on a quarterly basis. If sufficient money is available in the fund, the department shall reimburse a company within 60 days of the date that an application is confirmed to be accurate under subsection (c).Section 4. Penalties.(a) Penalties.--If the department determines that a company has submitted a false application or if the department erroneously paid a reimbursement due to false information, the company:20250SB0379PN0326 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) shall pay back the reimbursement, if any;(2) is prohibited from seeking reimbursement from the fund; and(3) is subject to a $5,000 fine.(b) Deposit of fines.--Any fines collected under subsection (a) shall be deposited into the fund.Section 5. Fund balance.The fund balance shall be limited to $2,500,000, and any amount in excess of $2,500,000 shall be transferred to the General Fund.Section 6. Reporting.Beginning January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit an annual report of the fund to the General Assembly.Section 7. Regulations.The department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer and enforce this act.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0379PN0326 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920